Utah statutes.
23-19-22.5.   Cougar or bear hunting permit.
(1)  A person 12 years of age or older, upon paying the cougar or bear hunting
permit fee established by the Wildlife Board and possessing a valid hunting or
combination license, may apply for or obtain a permit to take cougar or bear
as provided by rules and proclamations of the Wildlife Board.
(2)  A person 11 years of age may apply for or obtain a cougar or bear hunting
permit consistent with the requirements of Subsection (1) if that person's
12th birthday falls within the calendar year in which the permit is issued.
(3)  One dollar of each cougar or bear permit fee collected from a resident
shall be used for the hunter education program.
